Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-180
Disciplinary actions; evidence of discipline by another state or jurisdiction.

For purposes of subdivision (12) of section 38-178, a certified copy of the record of denial, refusal of renewal, limitation, suspension, or revocation of a license, certificate, registration, or other similar credential or the taking of other disciplinary measures against it by another state or jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence of a violation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 80;

Laws 2019, LB449, § 2.